Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 5. Name.

§ 13.1-630.
Corporate name.

A corporate name shall contain the word “corporation,” “incorporated,” “company,” or “limited,” or the abbreviation “corp.,” “inc.,” “co.,” or “ltd.” Such words and their corresponding abbreviations may be used interchangeably for all purposes.

A corporate name shall not contain:

Any language stating or implying that the corporation will conduct any of the special kinds of businesses listed in §

13.1-620

unless it proposes in fact to engage in such special kind of business;

The word “redevelopment” unless the corporation is organized as an urban redevelopment corporation pursuant to Chapter 190 of the Acts of Assembly of 1946, as amended;

Any word, abbreviation, or combination of characters that states or implies the corporation is a limited liability company, a limited partnership, a registered limited liability partnership, or a protected series of a series limited liability company; or

Any word or phrase that is prohibited by law for such corporation.

Except as authorized by subsection D, a corporate name shall be distinguishable upon the records of the Commission from:

The name of any corporation, whether issuing shares or not issuing shares, existing under the laws of the Commonwealth or authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A corporate name reserved or registered under §

13.1-631

,

13.1-632

,

13.1-830

or

13.1-831

;

The designated name adopted by a foreign corporation, whether issuing shares or not issuing shares, because its real name is unavailable for use in the Commonwealth;

The name of a domestic limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company registered to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A limited liability company name reserved under §

13.1-1013

;

The designated name adopted by a foreign limited liability company because its real name is unavailable for use in the Commonwealth;

The name of a domestic business trust or a foreign business trust registered to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A business trust name reserved under §

13.1-1215

;

The designated name adopted by a foreign business trust because its real name is unavailable for use in the Commonwealth;

The name of a domestic limited partnership or a foreign limited partnership registered to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A limited partnership name reserved under §

50-73.3

; and

The designated name adopted by a foreign limited partnership because its real name is unavailable for use in the Commonwealth.

A domestic corporation may apply to the Commission for authorization to use a name that is not distinguishable upon the Commission’s records from one or more of the names described in subsection C. The Commission shall authorize use of the name applied for if the other entity consents to the use in writing and submits an undertaking in a form satisfactory to the Commission to change its name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the Commission from the name of the applying corporation.

The use of assumed names or fictitious names, as provided for in Chapter 5 (§ 59.1-69 et seq.) of Title 59.1, is not affected by this chapter.

The Commission, in determining whether a corporate name is distinguishable upon its records from the name of any of the business entities listed in subsection C, shall not consider any word, phrase, abbreviation, or designation required or permitted under this section and §

13.1-544.1

, subsection A of §

13.1-1012

, §

13.1-1104

, subsection A of §

50-73.2

, and subdivision A 2 of §

50-73.78

to be contained in the name of a business entity formed or organized under the laws of the Commonwealth or authorized or registered to transact business in the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-6; 1956, c. 428; 1968, c. 241; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 232; 2003, c. 592; 2005, cc. 379, 765; 2009, c. 216; 2012, c. 63; 2019, c. 734; 2020, c. 1226; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Cross references.

As to corporate name of savings institutions, see §

6.2-1116

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 592, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only, (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to the effective date of this act [October 1, 2004] with respect to the name of a corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership, and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to the effective date of this act to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

Acts 2012, c. 63, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to the effective date of this act with respect to the name of a corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the propriety of its name prior to the effective date of this act to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 592, effective October 1, 2004, rewrote subsection C; and added subsection F.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 379, effective March 21, 2005, in subsection F, added “designation” and substituted “section and §

13.1-544.1

, subsection A of §

13.1-1012

, §

13.1-1104

, subdivision 1 of §

50-73.2

, and subdivision A 2 of §

50-73.78

” for “chapter, Chapters 7 (§

13.1-542

et seq.), 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.), 13 (§

13.1-1100

et seq.), and 14 (§

13.1-1200

et seq.) of this title, and Chapter 2.1 (§

50-73.1

et seq.) of Title 50”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 deleted “of this section” following “subsection D” in subsection C; substituted “the Commission” for “its” and deleted “of this section” following “subsection C” in subsection D; and made stylistic changes throughout the section.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 216, in subsection B, added subdivision B 2, redesignated former subdivision B 2 as subdivision B 3 and made a related change; and in subsection D, substituted “the” for “1. The,” inserted “a” preceding “form” and deleted “2. [Repealed.]” at the end.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 63 inserted present subdivision B 3; substituted “subsection A” for “subdivision 1” in subsection F; and made related changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision B 1, substituted “the corporation will conduct any” for “it will transact one.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1226, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “a limited partnership, or a protected series of a series limited liability company” for “or, a limited partnership” in subdivision B 3.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “Acts of Assembly of 1946” for “1946 Acts of Assembly” in subdivision B 2; and inserted “a registered limited liability partnership” in subdivision B 3. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For article, “The New Virginia Stock Corporation Act: A Primer,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 67 (1985).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, § 36.

§ 13.1-631.
Reserved name.

A person may apply to the Commission to reserve the exclusive use of a corporate name, including a designated name for a foreign corporation. The corporate name applied for need not comply with subsection A of §

13.1-630

. If the Commission finds that the corporate name applied for is distinguishable upon the records of the Commission, it shall reserve the name for the applicant’s exclusive use for a 120-day period.

The owner of a reserved corporate name may renew the reservation for successive periods of 120 days each by filing with the Commission, during the 45-day period preceding the date of expiration of the reservation, a renewal application.

The owner of a reserved corporate name may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the Commission a notice of the transfer, signed by the applicant for whom the name was reserved, and specifying the name and address of the transferee.

A reserved corporate name may be used by its owner in connection with (i) the formation of, or an amendment to change the name of, a domestic stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; (ii) an application for a certificate of authority or registration to transact business in the Commonwealth as a foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; or (iii) an amended application for such authority or registration, provided that the proposed name complies with the provisions of §

13.1-630

,

13.1-762

,

13.1-829

,

13.1-924

,

13.1-1012

,

13.1-1054

,

13.1-1214

,

13.1-1244

,

50-73.2

, or

50-73.56

, as the case may be.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-7; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2015, c. 444; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 added “by filing with the Commission, during the 45-day period preceding the date of expiration of the reservation, a renewal application” at the end of subsection B.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 444 in subsection A, deleted “whose corporate name is not available” at the end of the first sentence, added the second sentence, and substituted “distinguishable upon the records of the Commission” for “available” in the last sentence; substituted “signed” for “executed” in subsection C; added subsection D; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection D, inserted “of” following “the formation”; and made a stylistic change.

§ 13.1-632.
Registered name.

A foreign corporation may register its corporate name, or its corporate name with any addition required by §

13.1-762

, if the name is distinguishable upon the records of the Commission.

A foreign corporation registers its corporate name, or its corporate name with any addition required by §

13.1-762

, by filing with the Commission (i) an application setting forth its corporate name, or its corporate name with any addition required by §

13.1-762

, the state or country and date of its incorporation, and a brief description of the nature of the business in which it is engaged; and (ii) a certificate setting forth that such corporation is in good standing, or a document of similar import, from the state or country of incorporation, executed by the official who has custody of the records pertaining to corporations.

Except as provided in subsection F, registration is effective for one year after the date an application is filed.

If the Commission finds that the corporate name applied for is available, it shall register the name for the applicant’s exclusive use.

A foreign corporation whose registration is effective may renew it for the succeeding year by filing with the Commission, during the 60-day period preceding the date of expiration of the registration, a renewal application that complies with the requirements of subsection B. The renewal application is effective when filed in accordance with this section and, except as provided in subsection F, renews the registration for one year after the date the registration would have expired if such subsequent renewal of the registration had not occurred.

A foreign corporation whose registration is effective may thereafter obtain a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth under the registered name or consent in writing to the use of that name by a corporation thereafter incorporated under this chapter or by another foreign corporation thereafter authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth. The registration terminates when the domestic corporation is incorporated or the foreign corporation obtains a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth or consents to the authorization of another foreign corporation to transact business in the Commonwealth under the registered name.

A foreign corporation that has in effect a registration of its corporate name may release such name by filing a notice of release of a registered name with the Commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-8; 1956, c. 428; 1981, c. 522; 1984, c. 771; 1985, c. 522; 1995, c. 114; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 734, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) amending and reenacting §§

13.1-615

,

13.1-615.1

,

13.1-616

,

13.1-632

,

13.1-721.1

, and

13.1-722.2

through

13.1-722.13

of the Code of Virginia; (ii) amending the Code of Virginia by adding in Chapter 9 of Title 13.1 an article numbered 1.1, consisting of sections numbered

13.1-614.1

through

13.1-614.8

, and by adding sections numbered

13.1-712.1

,

13.1-722.1:1

,

13.1-722.7:1

, and

13.1-722.12:1

; and (iii) repealing §§

13.1-722.4

,

13.1-722.7

, and

13.1-722.14

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, deleted “from the corporate names that are not available under subsection C of §

13.1-630

” from the end; deleted the designation for former subdivision B 1; deleted former subdivision B 2, which read: “Paying to the Commission a registration fee in the amount of $20”; redesignated the former final paragraph of subsection B as subsection C and redesignated former subsections C through F as D through G, respectively; in subsection E, deleted “and paying a renewal fee of $20” preceding “The renewal”; updated an internal reference; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-633.
Repealed by Acts 2007, c. 771, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

13.1-633

, relating to property title records, was derived from Code 1950, § 13.1-127; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 1996, c. 282; 2005, c. 765.